Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 5

Cremation

62-5-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Body parts” means limbs or other portions of the anatomy that are removed from a living person for medical purposes during biopsy, treatment or surgery. “Body parts” also includes dead human bodies that have been donated to science for purposes of medical education or research and any parts of such a dead human body that were removed for those purposes. Nothing in this part shall be construed to permit the cremation of medical waste at the request of a hospital or other institution. Only the individual from whose body the parts were removed or the individual's duly appointed representative may make arrangements with the crematory for the cremation of body parts;

“Casket” means a rigid container that is designed for the encasement of a dead human body and that is constructed of wood, metal or another rigid material, is ornamented and lined with fabric and may or may not be combustible;

“Temporary container” means a receptacle for cremated remains composed of cardboard, plastic, metal or another material that can be closed in a manner that prevents the leakage or spillage of the cremated remains and the entrance of foreign material and that is of sufficient size to hold the cremated remains until they are placed in an urn or scattered; and

“Urn” means a receptacle designed to encase cremated remains permanently.

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 1; 2000, ch. 779, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-5-501 (Acts 1982, ch. 703, § 1), concerning designation by deceased and disposal of ashes, was repealed by Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 12.

62-5-502, 62-5-503. [Reserved.]

No operator of a crematory facility shall cremate or allow the cremation at a crematory facility of a dead human body, other than one that was donated to science for purposes of medical education or research, until all of the following have occurred:

The requirements of § 62-5-513 have been met, unless the decedent having died from a virulent communicable disease, the department of health or board of health having territorial jurisdiction where the death of the decedent occurred requires by rule or order the cremation to occur prior to those requirements being met;

The operator has received a permit for cremation of human remains that authorizes the cremation of the decedent; and

The operator has received any other documentation required by this state or a political subdivision of this state.

Upon the submission of a sworn affidavit by an operator of a crematory that the operator has completed the cremation of human remains without charge, the department of health shall issue a refund of any fees associated with the receipt of a permit as required in subdivision (a)(2).

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 4; 2000, ch. 779, §§ 4, 5, 30; 2012, ch. 799, § 2; 2019, ch. 375, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 375, § 2 provided that the exemption created by the act shall apply to fees assessed on or after July 1, 2019.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 375, § 3. July 1, 2019.

62-5-505. [Reserved.]

62-5-507. Crematory facility operator duties.

The operator of a crematory facility may schedule the time for the cremation of a dead human body to occur at the operator's own convenience at any time after the conditions set forth in § 62-5-504 have been met and the decedent or body parts have been delivered to the facility, unless, in the case of a dead human body, the operator has received specific instructions to the contrary from the licensed establishment. The operator of a crematory facility becomes responsible for a dead human body or body parts when the body or body parts have been delivered to or accepted by the facility or an employee or agent of the facility.

No operator of a crematory facility shall fail to do either of the following:

Upon receipt at the crematory facility of any dead human body that has not been embalmed, place the body in a holding or refrigerated facility at the crematory facility and keep the body in the holding or refrigerated facility until near the time the cremation process commences or until the body is held at the facility for eight (8) hours or longer. If the body is held for eight (8) hours or longer, place the body in a refrigerated facility at the crematory facility and keep the body in the refrigerated facility until near the time the cremation process commences; or

Upon receipt of any dead human body that has been embalmed, place the body in a holding facility at the crematory facility and keep the body in the holding facility until the cremation process commences.

No operator of a crematory facility shall fail to cremate, in its entirety with the body, the casket or container, if any, in which the body was delivered or accepted by the crematory facility, if the instructions for the disposition of the body so request that item be cremated with the body; provided, that the crematory facility shall be permitted to remove any non-combustible materials from the casket or container prior to cremation.

No operator of a crematory facility shall simultaneously cremate more than one (1) decedent or body parts removed from more than one (1) decedent or living person in the same cremation chamber. This subsection (d) does not prohibit the use of cremation equipment that contains more than one (1) cremation chamber.

No operator of a crematory facility shall permit any person other than employees of the crematory facility, a licensed funeral director or a designee of a funeral director and persons authorized pursuant to the instructions of the decedent or an heir or personal representative of the decedent, if any, to be present in the holding facility or cremation room while any dead human bodies or body parts are being held there prior to cremation or are being cremated or while any cremated remains are being removed from the cremation chamber.

No operator of a crematory facility shall remove any dental gold, body parts, organs or other items of value from a dead human body prior to the cremation or from the cremated remains after cremation unless the operator was acting under instructions that specifically authorize the removal of any dental gold, body parts, organs or other items of value.

No operator of a crematory facility who removes any dental gold, body parts, organs, or other items from a dead human body or assists in the removal shall charge a fee for doing so that exceeds the actual cost to the crematory facility for performing or assisting in the removal of those materials.

Upon the completion of each cremation, the operator of a crematory facility shall remove from the cremation chamber all of the cremation residue that is practicably recoverable. If all of the recovered cremated remains will not fit in the urn selected or in the temporary container, the operator shall place the remainder in a separate temporary container; and the cremated remains placed in the separate temporary container shall be delivered, released or disposed of together with those in the urn or other temporary container. Nothing in this section requires an operator of a crematory facility to recover any specified quantity or quality of cremated remains upon the completion of a cremation, but shall only require an operator to recover from the cremation chamber all of the cremation residue that is practically recoverable.

No operator of a crematory facility shall knowingly represent that an urn or temporary container contains the recovered cremated remains of a specific decedent or of body parts removed from a specific decedent or living person when it does not. This section does not prohibit the making of such a representation because of the presence in the recovered cremated remains of de minimis amounts of the cremated remains of another decedent or of body parts.

Operators of a crematory facility or a funeral director shall ship or cause to be shipped any cremated remains by a class or method of mail, common carrier service or delivery service that has an internal system for tracing the location of the cremated remains during shipment and that requires a signed receipt from the person accepting delivery of the cremated remains.

Operators of a crematory facility shall establish and maintain a system for accurately identifying each dead human body in the facility's possession and for identifying each decedent or living person from whom body parts in the facility's possession were removed throughout all phases of the holding and cremation process.

No operator of a crematory facility shall knowingly use or allow the use of the same cremation chamber for the cremation of dead human bodies or human body parts and animals.

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 7; 2000, ch. 779, §§ 8-15.

62-5-508. Final disposition of remains — Unclaimed cremated remains.

Except as provided in subsection (b), no person shall:

Dispose of the cremated remains of a dead human body or body parts in such a manner or in such a location that the cremated remains are commingled with those of another decedent or body parts removed from another decedent or living person; or

Place the cremated remains of more than one (1) decedent or of body parts removed from more than one (1) decedent or living person in the same urn or temporary container.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person may:

Scatter cremated remains at sea, by air or in a dedicated area at a cemetery used exclusively for the scattering on the ground of the cremated remains of dead human bodies or body parts;

Commingle cremated remains of more than one (1) decedent or of body parts removed from more than one (1) decedent or living person or the placement in the same urn or temporary container of the cremated remains of more than one (1) decedent or of body parts removed from more than one (1) decedent or living person if operating under specific instructions from the decedent or decedents or an heir or personal representative designated by the decedent or decedents to make such a decision; and

If the person is operating under the decedent's instructions, commingle the cremated remains or body parts removed from another decedent or living person, after receipt of the cremated remains or the body parts, with those of another decedent or body parts removed from another decedent or living person.

Unless otherwise specified by any written agreement between the operator of the crematory facility or funeral establishment and the person or entity requesting the cremation of human remains, any cremated human remains unclaimed one hundred eighty (180) calendar days from the date of cremation, may be interred, entombed, or inurned by the operator of the crematory facility, and a record of the disposition of such unclaimed cremated human remains shall be made available by the operator of the crematory facility or funeral establishment for inspection on weekdays between the hours of eight o’clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) and four-thirty p.m. (4:30 p.m.).

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 8; 2000, ch. 779, §§ 16-18; 2010, ch. 655, § 1; 2014, ch. 690, § 3.

62-5-509. Written receipt for remains — Records.

No operator of a crematory facility shall fail to ensure that a written receipt is provided to the person who delivers a dead human body or body parts to the facility for cremation.

If the dead human body is other than one that was donated to science for purposes of medical education or research, the receipt shall be signed by both a representative of the crematory facility and the person who delivered the decedent to the crematory facility and shall indicate:

The name of the decedent;

The date and time of delivery;

The type of casket or container, if any, in which the decedent was delivered to the facility;

The name of the person who delivered the decedent to the facility, if applicable;

The name of the funeral home or other establishment with whom the delivery person is affiliated; and

The name of the person who received the decedent on behalf of the facility.

If the dead human body was donated to science for purposes of medical education or research, the receipt shall indicate the name of the person who received the decedent on behalf of the facility.

At the time of releasing cremated remains, an operator of a crematory facility shall ensure that a written receipt signed by both a representative of the crematory facility and the person who received the cremated remains is provided to the person who received the cremated remains. Unless the cremated remains are those of a dead human body that was donated to science for purposes of medical education or research or are those of body parts, the receipt shall indicate:

The name of the decedent;

The date and time of the release;

The name of the person to whom the cremated remains were released;

If applicable, the name of the funeral home, cemetery or other entity to whom the cremated remains were released; and

The name of the person who released the cremated remains on behalf of the crematory facility.

If the cremated remains are those of a dead human body that was donated to science for purposes of medical education or research or are those of body parts, the receipt shall be signed by both a representative of the crematory facility and the person who received the cremated remains; and the receipt shall indicate the date and time of the release. For other cremated remains, the receipt required by this section shall accompany the cremated remains. The signature of the person whose name is on the delivery receipt to accept delivery of the cremated remains meets the requirement of this section that the person receiving the cremated remains sign the receipt provided by the crematory facility.

During the time that the crematory remains engaged in the business of cremating dead human bodies or body parts, the crematory facility shall keep the following for a period of at least seven (7) years:

A copy of each receipt issued upon acceptance by or delivery to the crematory facility of a dead human body;

A record of each cremation conducted at the facility, containing at least the name of the decedent or, in the case of body parts, the name of the decedent or living person from whom the body parts were removed, the date and time of the cremation and the final disposition made of the cremated remains;

A copy of each delivery receipt issued under this section; and

A separate record of the cremated remains of each decedent or the body parts removed from each decedent or living person that were disposed of containing at least the name of the decedent, the date and time of the cremation and the location, date and manner of final disposition of the cremated remains.

All records required to be maintained under this part are subject to inspection by the board of funeral directors and embalmers or an authorized representative of the board, upon reasonable notice, at any reasonable time.

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 9; 2000, ch. 779, §§ 19-23.

62-5-510. Removal of devices or implants from remains.

If a funeral director delivers the decedent to a crematory facility, the funeral director shall take reasonable precautions to ensure necessary actions are taken to remove a device or implant from the decedent or to render the device or implant nonhazardous prior to delivering the decedent to the crematory facility if the funeral director is aware of such a device or implant.

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 10; 2000, ch. 779, § 24.

62-5-511. Crematory facility operator liability.

The operator of a crematory facility is not liable for damages in a civil action for any of the following actions or omissions, unless the actions or omissions were made with malicious purpose, in bad faith or in a wanton or reckless manner:

Having performed the cremation of the decedent, or having released or disposed of the cremated remains, in accordance with the instructions set forth by the decedent or an heir or personal representative of the decedent;

Having performed the cremation of the decedent or body parts removed from the decedent or living person or having released or disposed of the cremated remains in accordance with the instructions set forth by the decedent or an heir or personal representative of the decedent; or

Any failure to correctly identify a dead human body prior to cremation.

The operator of a crematory facility is not liable for damages in a civil action for refusing to accept a dead human body or body parts or to perform a cremation under any of the following circumstances, unless the refusal was made with malicious purpose, in bad faith or in a wanton or reckless manner:

The operator has actual knowledge that there is a dispute regarding the cremation of the decedent or body parts, and the operator has not received an order of the court having jurisdiction ordering the cremation of the decedent or body parts;

The operator has a reasonable basis for questioning the accuracy of any of the information or statements provided to the operator with respect to the cremation of the decedent or body parts; or

The operator has any other lawful reason for refusing to accept the dead human body or body parts or to perform the cremation.

The operator of a crematory facility is not liable for damages in a civil action in connection with the cremation of or disposition of the cremated remains of any dental gold, jewelry or other items of value delivered to the facility with a dead human body or body parts unless the actions or omissions of the operator were made with malicious purpose, in bad faith or in a wanton or reckless manner.

This section does not create a new cause of action or substantive legal right against the operator of a crematory facility.

This section does not affect any immunities from civil liability or defenses established by law to which the operator of a crematory facility may be entitled.

Acts 1999, ch. 215, § 11; 2000, ch. 779, §§ 25-28.

62-5-512. Cremation without a casket.

No operator of a crematory facility shall require a person to be cremated in a casket; provided, that in the discretion of the operator of a crematory facility, a container composed of readily combustible materials that is suitable for cremation, other than a casket, may be required.

Acts 2000, ch. 779, § 29.

62-5-513. Delay of cremation.

If a person who signs the death certificate, a district attorney general or any law enforcement officer, or an emergency medical or rescue worker, emergency medical technician or paramedic who attended the person immediately prior to or after the person's death, signs a written statement requesting the delay of a cremation based upon a reasonable belief that the cause of death may have been due to other than accidental or natural causes, then the cremation of a dead human body shall be delayed based upon that request.

Acts 2000, ch. 779, § 31.